Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 2
CONTROL ACT

Law reviews:

For article, "Metropolitan District Service Plans: An Overview of Municipal Review", see 33

C

olo. Law. 63 (April 2004).

32-1-201. Applicability.

This part 2 shall be applicable to any petition for the organization of any proposed special district filed in any district court of competent jurisdiction, except where a petition for the organization of a special district confined exclusively within the boundaries of any existing municipality has been approved by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-203 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-202. Filing of service plan required - report of filing - contents - fee.

Persons proposing the organization of a special district, except for a special district that is contained entirely within the boundaries of a municipality and subject to the provisions of section 32-1-204.5, shall submit a service plan to the board of county commissioners of each county that has territory included within the boundaries of the proposed special district prior to filing a petition for the organization of the proposed special district in any district court. The service plan shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder for the board of county commissioners at least ten days prior to a regular meeting of the board of county commissioners, the division, and the state auditor. Within five days after the filing of any service plan, the county clerk and recorder, on behalf of the board of county commissioners, shall report to the division on forms furnished by the division the name and type of the proposed special district for which the service plan has been filed. If required by county policy adopted pursuant to the procedure provided in section 30-28-112, C.R.S., the service plan shall be referred to the planning commission which shall consider and make a recommendation on the service plan to the board of county commissioners within thirty days after the plan was filed with the county clerk and recorder. At the next regular meeting of the board of county commissioners that is held at least ten days after the final planning commission action on the service plan, the board of county commissioners shall set a date within thirty days of the meeting for a public hearing on the service plan of the proposed special district. The board of county commissioners shall provide written notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to the division. The board of county commissioners may continue the hearing for a period not to exceed thirty days unless the proponents of the special district and the board agree to continue the hearing for a longer period.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section, the service plan of a proposed health service district, health assurance district, or early childhood development service district shall not be referred to the county planning commission for consideration or recommendations. At the next regular meeting of the board of county commissioners that is held at least ten days after the filing of the service plan with the county clerk and recorder, the board of county commissioners shall set a date within thirty days of such filing for a public hearing on the service plan of the proposed district. The board of county commissioners shall provide written notice of the meeting pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The service plan shall contain the following:

A description of the proposed services;

A financial plan showing how the proposed services are to be financed, including the proposed operating revenue derived from property taxes for the first budget year of the district, which shall not be materially exceeded except as authorized pursuant to section 32-1-207 or 29-1-302, C.R.S. All proposed indebtedness for the district shall be displayed together with a schedule indicating the year or years in which the debt is scheduled to be issued. The board of directors of the district shall notify the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the municipality of any alteration or revision of the proposed schedule of debt issuance set forth in the financial plan.

A preliminary engineering or architectural survey showing how the proposed services are to be provided;

A map of the proposed special district boundaries and an estimate of the population and valuation for assessment of the proposed special district;

A general description of the facilities to be constructed and the standards of such construction, including a statement of how the facility and service standards of the proposed special district are compatible with facility and service standards of any county within which all or any portion of the proposed special district is to be located, and of municipalities and special districts which are interested parties pursuant to section 32-1-204 (1);

A general description of the estimated cost of acquiring land, engineering services, legal services, administrative services, initial proposed indebtedness and estimated proposed maximum interest rates and discounts, and other major expenses related to the organization and initial operation of the district;

A description of any arrangement or proposed agreement with any political subdivision for the performance of any services between the proposed special district and such other political subdivision, and, if the form contract to be used is available, it shall be attached to the service plan;

Information, along with other evidence presented at the hearing, satisfactory to establish that each of the criteria set forth in section 32-1-203, if applicable, is met;

Such additional information as the board of county commissioners may require by resolution on which to base its findings pursuant to section 32-1-203;

For a mental health-care service district, any additional information required by section 32-17-107 (2) that is not otherwise required by paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection (2);

For a health assurance district, any additional information required by section 32-19-106 (2) that is not otherwise required by paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection (2);

For an early childhood development service district, any additional information required by section 32-21-105 (2) that is not otherwise required by subsections (2)(a) to (2)(i) of this section.

(2.1) No service plan shall be approved if a petition objecting to the service plan and signed by the owners of taxable real and personal property, which property equals more than fifty percent of the total valuation for assessment of all taxable real and personal property to be included in such district, is filed with the board of county commissioners no later than ten days prior to the hearing under section 32-1-204, unless such property has been excluded by the board of county commissioners under section 32-1-203 (3.5).

Each service plan filed shall be accompanied by a processing fee set by the board of county commissioners not to exceed five hundred dollars, which shall be deposited into the county general fund; except that the board of county commissioners may waive such fee. Such processing fee shall be utilized to reimburse the county for reasonable direct costs related to processing such service plan and the hearing prescribed by section 32-1-204, including the costs of notice, publication, and recording of testimony. If the board of county commissioners determines that special review of the service plan is required, the board may impose an additional fee to reimburse the county for reasonable direct costs related to such special review. If the board imposes such an additional fee, it shall not be less than five hundred dollars, and it shall not exceed one one-hundredth of one percent of the total amount of the debt to be issued by the district as indicated in the service plan or the amended service plan or ten thousand dollars, whichever is less. The board may waive all or any portion of the additional fee.

In the case of a proposed health service district, submission to the board of county commissioners by the petitioners of a license or certificate of compliance or evidence of a pending application for a license or certificate of compliance issued by the department of public health and environment shall constitute compliance with subsection (2) of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1547, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1) amended, p. 491, § 1, effective February 19.

L. 85:

(1) amended, (2) R&RE, and (4) added, pp. 1098, 1099, §§ 1-3, effective May 3; (2.1) added, p. 1104, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1030, § 13, effective January 1, 1987.

L. 90:

(3) amended, p. 1452, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 781, § 3, effective June 4.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 2802, § 566, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 473, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(j) added, p. 1035, § 2, effective June 2.

L. 2007:

(1) amended and (2) (k) added, pp. 1186, 1187, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended and (2)(l) added, (HB 19-1052), ch. 72, p. 257, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-204 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-203. Action on service plan - criteria.

The board of county commissioners of each county which has territory included within the proposed special district, other than a proposed special district which is contained entirely within the boundaries of a municipality, shall constitute the approving authority under this part 2 and shall review any service plan filed by the petitioners of any proposed special district. With reference to the review of any service plan, the board of county commissioners has the following authority:

To approve without condition or modification the service plan submitted;

To disapprove the service plan submitted;

To conditionally approve the service plan subject to the submission of additional information relating to or the modification of the proposed service plan.

The board of county commissioners shall disapprove the service plan unless evidence satisfactory to the board of each of the following is presented:

There is sufficient existing and projected need for organized service in the area to be serviced by the proposed special district.

The existing service in the area to be served by the proposed special district is inadequate for present and projected needs.

The proposed special district is capable of providing economical and sufficient service to the area within its proposed boundaries.

The area to be included in the proposed special district has, or will have, the financial ability to discharge the proposed indebtedness on a reasonable basis.

(2.5) The board of county commissioners may disapprove the service plan if evidence satisfactory to the board of any of the following, at the discretion of the board, is not presented:

Adequate service is not, or will not be, available to the area through the county or other existing municipal or quasi-municipal corporations, including existing special districts, within a reasonable time and on a comparable basis.

The facility and service standards of the proposed special district are compatible with the facility and service standards of each county within which the proposed special district is to be located and each municipality which is an interested party under section 32-1-204 (1).

The proposal is in substantial compliance with a master plan adopted pursuant to section 30-28-106, C.R.S.

The proposal is in compliance with any duly adopted county, regional, or state long-range water quality management plan for the area.

The creation of the proposed special district will be in the best interests of the area proposed to be served.

The board of county commissioners may conditionally approve the service plan of a proposed special district upon satisfactory evidence that it does not comply with one or more of the criteria enumerated in subsection (2) of this section. Final approval shall be contingent upon modification of the service plan to include such changes or additional information as shall be specifically stated in the findings of the board of county commissioners.

(3.5) (a) The board of county commissioners may exclude territory from a proposed special district prior to approval of the service plan submitted by the petitioners of a proposed special district. The petitioners shall have the burden of proving that the exclusion of the property is not in the best interests of the proposed special district. Any person owning property in the proposed special district who requests that his or her property be excluded from the special district prior to approval of the service plan shall submit the request to the board of county commissioners no later than ten days prior to the hearing held under section 32-1-204, but the board of county commissioners shall not be limited in its action with respect to exclusion of territory based upon the request. Any request for exclusion shall be acted upon before final action of the county commissioners under section 32-1-205.

Notwithstanding subsection (3.5)(a) of this section, if the service plan submitted by the petitioners of a proposed special district is for a health service district, health assurance district, or early childhood development service district, the board of county commissioners shall not accept or act upon the request of a person owning property in the proposed special district that his or her property be excluded from the special district.

The findings of the board of county commissioners shall be based solely upon the service plan and evidence presented at the hearing by the petitioners, planning commission, and any interested party.

In the case of a proposed health service district, submission to the board of county commissioners by the petitioners of a license or certificate of compliance or evidence of a pending application for a license or certificate of compliance issued by the department of public health and environment shall constitute compliance with subsections (2) and (2.5) of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1548, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, (2) R&RE, and (2.5) and (5) added, pp. 1099, 1100, §§ 4, 5, effective May 3; (3.5) added, p. 1104, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) amended, p. 2802, § 567, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 473, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3.5) amended, p. 1187, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3.5)(b) amended, (HB 19-1052), ch. 72, p. 258, § 3, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

32-1-204. Public hearing on service plan - procedures - decision.

The board of county commissioners shall provide written notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to the petitioners and the governing body of any existing municipality or special district that has levied an ad valorem tax within the next preceding tax year and that has boundaries within a radius of three miles of the proposed special district boundaries, which governmental units shall be interested parties for the purposes of this part 2. The board of county commissioners shall make publication of the date, time, location, and purpose of the hearing, the first of which shall be at least twenty days prior to the hearing date. The board of county commissioners shall include in the notice a general description of the land contained within the boundaries of the proposed special district and information outlining methods and procedures pursuant to section 32-1-203 (3.5) concerning the filing of a petition for exclusion of territory; except that, if the hearing is to review a service plan for a health service district, health assurance district, or early childhood development service district, the notice shall not include information regarding filing a petition for exclusion of territory. The publications shall constitute constructive notice to the residents and property owners within the proposed special district who shall also be interested parties at the hearing.

(1.5) Not more than thirty days nor less than twenty days prior to the hearing held pursuant to this section, the petitioners for the organization of the special district shall send letter notification of the hearing to the property owners within the proposed special district as listed on the records of the county assessor on the date requested unless the petitioners represent one hundred percent of the property owners. The notification shall indicate that it is a notice of a hearing for the organization of a special district and shall indicate the date, time, location, and purpose of such hearing, a reference to the type of special district, the maximum mill levy, if any, or stating that there is no maximum that may be imposed by the proposed special district, and procedures for the filing of a petition for exclusion pursuant to section 32-1-203 (3.5). Except when no mailing is required, the mailing of the letter notification to all addresses or post office box addresses within the proposed special district shall constitute a good-faith effort to comply with this subsection (1.5), and failure to notify all electors thereby shall not provide grounds for a challenge to the hearing being held.

If there is a county planning commission or a regional planning commission in lieu thereof, the service plan submitted by the petitioners for the organization of the proposed special district shall be delivered by the county clerk and recorder to such planning commission. The county planning commission or regional planning commission shall study such service plan and present its recommendations consistent with this part 2 to the board of county commissioners within thirty days following the filing of the service plan with the county clerk and recorder.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, the service plan of a proposed health service district, health assurance district, or early childhood development service district shall not be delivered to the planning commission for study or recommendations unless specifically requested by the petitioners. If the petitioners do not request that the service plan be delivered to the planning commission, the clerk and recorder shall deliver the service plan to the board of county commissioners and the planning commission shall not be required to study the service plan or to present recommendations to the board of county commissioners pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section.

The hearing held by the board of county commissioners shall be open to the public, and a record of the proceedings shall be made. All interested parties as defined in this section shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard under such rules of procedure as may be established by the board of county commissioners. Any testimony or evidence which in the discretion of the board of county commissioners is relevant to the organization of the proposed special district shall be considered.

Within twenty days after the completion of the hearing, the board of county commissioners shall advise the petitioners for the organization of the proposed special district in writing of its action on the service plan. If the service plan is approved as submitted, a resolution of approval shall be issued to the petitioners. If the service plan is disapproved, the specific detailed reasons for such disapproval shall be set forth in writing. If the service plan is conditionally approved, the changes or modifications to be made in, or additional information relating to, the service plan, together with the reasons for such changes, modifications, or additional information, shall also be set forth in writing, and the proceeding shall be continued until such changes, modifications, or additional information is incorporated in the service plan. Upon the incorporation of such changes, modifications, or additional information in the service plan of the proposed special district, the board of county commissioners shall issue a resolution of approval to the petitioners.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1549, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1.5) added, p. 1106, § 1, effective January 1, 1986.

L. 91:

(1), (1.5), and (2) amended, p. 782, § 4, effective June 4.

L. 96:

(1.5) amended, p. 309, § 7, effective April 15.

L. 2007:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1188, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, (HB 19-1052), ch. 72, p. 258, § 4, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-208 as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-204.5. Approval by municipality.

No special district shall be organized if its boundaries are wholly contained within the boundaries of a municipality or municipalities, except upon adoption of a resolution of approval by the governing body of each municipality. The information required and criteria applicable to such approval shall be the information required and criteria set forth in sections 32-1-202 (2) and 32-1-203 (2). With reference to the review of any service plan, the governing body of each municipality has the following authority:

To approve without condition or modification, the service plan submitted;

To disapprove the service plan submitted;

To conditionally approve the service plan subject to the submission of additional information relating to, or the modification of, the proposed service plan or by agreement with the proponents of the proposed service plan.

In the case of a proposed health service district, submission to the governing body of the municipality of a license or certificate of compliance or evidence of a pending application for a license or certificate of compliance issued by the department of public health and environment shall constitute compliance with the requirements of sections 32-1-202 (2) and 32-1-203 (2) and (2.5) as required by subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1101, § 6, effective May 3.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 2802, § 568, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 473, § 10, effective July 1.

32-1-204.7. Approval by an annexing municipality.

If a special district that was originally approved by a board of county commissioners becomes wholly contained within the boundaries of a municipality or municipalities by annexation or boundary adjustment, the governing body of the special district may petition the governing body of any such municipality to accept a designation as the approving authority for the special district. The municipality may accept the designation through the adoption of a resolution of approval by the governing body of the municipality.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the governing body of any municipality pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, all powers and authorities vested in the board of county commissioners pursuant to this article shall be transferred to the governing body of the municipality, which shall constitute the approving authority for the special district for all purposes under this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1315, § 2, effective August 6.

32-1-205. Resolution of approval required.

A petition for the organization of a special district filed in any district court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the provisions of section 32-1-301 shall be accompanied by a resolution approving the service plan of the proposed special district by the board of county commissioners of each county where the territory of the proposed special district lies or, where required pursuant to section 32-1-204.5, by a resolution of approval by the governing body of each municipality. If the boundaries of a proposed special district include territory within two or more counties, a resolution approving the service plan for such special district shall be required from the board of county commissioners of each county which has territory included in the proposed special district; but the board of county commissioners of each of the respective counties, in their discretion, may hold a joint hearing on the proposed special district in accordance with section 32-1-204.

Except as provided in section 32-1-206, no petition for the organization of a special district shall be considered by any court in this state without the resolution of approval and the service plan required by this part 2. The approved service plan and the resolution of approval required by this part 2 shall be incorporated by reference in and appended to the order establishing the special district after all other legal procedures for the organization of the proposed special district have been complied with.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1550, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1101, § 7, effective May 3.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 783, § 5, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 32-1-206 and 32-1-209 (1) as they existed prior to 1981.

32-1-206. Judicial review.

If the petitioners for the organization of a proposed special district fail to secure such resolution of approval in the first instance or on remand from any board of county commissioners or, where required pursuant to section 32-1-204.5, from the governing body of any municipality, the petitioners may request the court to review such action. If the court determines such action to be arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, the court shall remand the matter back to the board of county commissioners or to the governing board of the municipality for further action with specific direction as necessary to avoid the arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable result. Another public hearing shall be held with notice to interested parties as defined in section 32-1-204 (1).

If the service plan is approved by the board of county commissioners, any interested party as defined in section 32-1-204 (1), if such party had appeared and presented its objections before the board of county commissioners, shall be given notice and have the right to appear and be heard at the hearing on the court petition for the organization of the special district, and the court may dismiss the court petition upon a determination that the decision of the board of county commissioners was arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1550, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 783, § 6, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-209 (1) as it existed prior to 1981.

32-1-207. Compliance - modification - enforcement.

Upon final approval by the court for the organization of the special district, the facilities, services, and financial arrangements of the special district shall conform so far as practicable to the approved service plan.

After the organization of a special district pursuant to the provisions of this part 2 and part 3 of this article, material modifications of the service plan as originally approved may be made by the governing body of such special district only by petition to and approval by the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the municipality that has adopted a resolution of approval of the special district pursuant to section 32-1-204.5 or 32-1-204.7 in substantially the same manner as is provided for the approval of an original service plan; but the processing fee for such modification procedure shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. Such approval of modifications shall be required only with regard to changes of a basic or essential nature, including but not limited to the following: Any addition to the types of services provided by the special district; a decrease in the level of services; a decrease in the financial ability of the district to discharge the existing or proposed indebtedness; or a decrease in the existing or projected need for organized service in the area. Approval for modification shall not be required for changes necessary only for the execution of the original service plan or for changes in the boundary of the special district; except that the inclusion of property that is located in a county or municipality with no other territory within the special district may constitute a material modification of the service plan or the statement of purposes of the special district as set forth in section 32-1-208. In the event that a special district changes its boundaries to include territory located in a county or municipality with no other territory within the special district, the special district shall notify the board of county commissioners of such county or the governing body of the municipality of such inclusion. The board of county commissioners or the governing body of the municipality may review such inclusion and, if it determines that the inclusion constitutes a material modification, may require the governing body of such special district to file a modification of its service plan in accordance with the provisions of this subsection (2).

Except as otherwise described in paragraph (d) of this subsection (2), a special district shall not furnish domestic water or sanitary sewer service directly to residents and property owners in unincorporated territory located in a county that has not approved the special district's service plan unless the special district notifies the board of county commissioners of the county of its plan to furnish domestic water or sanitary sewer service directly to residents and property owners in the county and receives approval from the board to do so. Within forty-five days of receiving the notification, the board may review the special district's planned action and may, in its own discretion and following notice by the board, require a public hearing prior to giving approval of the planned action, prior to which hearing the governing body of the special district shall provide such information and data as the board reasonably requests. Failure to provide information as requested by the board is grounds for the board to delay the public hearing until the board receives the information. The board shall either approve or deny the proposed action within one hundred twenty days of the public hearing.

Before approving a planned special district action described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the board of county commissioners of a county shall, not less than forty-five days prior to the first meeting of the board at which the approval specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2) may be given, provide public notice in the manner that the county requires of the possible approval within the newly described area to be served. The notice is required to include specific notification that any property owner wishing to have his or her property excluded from the proposed area to be served shall, not later than forty days from the first public notice, request that his or her property be excluded from the proposed area to be served by the special district. The board is not limited in its action with respect to exclusion of territory based on the request. A request for exclusion shall include a legal description of the property subject to the request, and the board shall act upon the request before taking final action on the request for approval pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

The requirements detailed in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (2) do not apply in the following circumstances:

A special district provides domestic water or sanitary sewer service only to private property owners pursuant to written agreement between the special district and the property owners;

A special district provides domestic water or sanitary sewer service within the boundaries of another governmental entity, including, without limitation, a city, a municipality, or another special district, pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement;

A special district provides any storm drainage or storm sewer services or facilities within the county; or

Domestic water service and sanitary sewer service is being provided, or a water or sanitary sewer service area extension has been approved by the county into which the service area is to be expanded, within unincorporated territory located in the county as of May 11, 2012.

Any material departure from the service plan as originally approved or, if the same has been modified, from the service plan as modified, which constitutes a material modification thereof as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, may be enjoined by the court approving the organization of such special district upon its own motion, upon the motion of the board of county commissioners or governing body of a municipality from which a resolution of approval is required by this part 2, or upon the motion of any interested party as defined in section 32-1-204 (1).

No action may be brought to enjoin the construction of any facility, the issuance of bonds or other financial obligations, the levy of taxes, the imposition of rates, fees, tolls and charges, or any other proposed activity of the special district unless such action is commenced within forty-five days after the special district has published notice of its intention to undertake such activity. Such notice shall describe the activity proposed to be undertaken by the special district and provide that any action to enjoin such activity as a material departure from the service plan must be brought within forty-five days from publication of the notice. The notice shall be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The district shall also provide notice to the district court. On or before the date of publication of the notice, the district shall also mail notice to the board of county commissioners or governing body of a municipality from which a resolution is required by this part 2.

Any special district created after July 1, 2000, shall file not more than once a year a special district annual report for the preceding calendar year. Unless the requirement is waived or otherwise requested by an earlier date by the board of county commissioners or by the governing body of the municipality in which a special district is wholly or partially located, commencing in 2023 for the 2022 calendar year, the annual report must be provided in accordance with this subsection (3)(c) by October 1 of each year. The annual report must be electronically filed with the governing body that approved the service plan or, if the jurisdiction has changed due to annexation into a municipality, the current governing body with jurisdiction over the special district, the division, and the state auditor, and such report must be electronically filed with the county clerk and recorder for public inspection, and a copy of the report must be made available by the special district on the special district's website pursuant to section 32-1-104.5 (3).

The report required by this subsection (3)(c) must include, as applicable for the reporting year, but shall not be limited to:

Boundary changes made;

Intergovernmental agreements entered into or terminated with other governmental entities;

Access information to obtain a copy of rules and regulations adopted by the board;

A summary of litigation involving public improvements owned by the special district;

The status of the construction of public improvements by the special district;

A list of facilities or improvements constructed by the special district that were conveyed or dedicated to the county or municipality;

The final assessed valuation of the special district as of December 31 of the reporting year;

A copy of the current year's budget;

A copy of the audited financial statements, if required by the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, or the application for exemption from audit, as applicable;

Notice of any uncured defaults existing for more than ninety days under any debt instrument of the special district; and

Any inability of the special district to pay its obligations as they come due under any obligation which continues beyond a ninety-day period.

Special districts operating under a consolidated service plan or serving the same community may file a consolidated annual report setting forth the information contained in this subsection (3)(c) for each of the special districts. The board of county commissioners or the governing body of the municipality may review the annual reports in a regularly scheduled public meeting, and such review must be included as an agenda item in the public notice for such meeting. A special district is not required to file an annual report for any year in which the special district was in inactive status for the entire year pursuant to section 32-1-104 (3).

The state auditor shall review the annual report and report any apparent decrease in the financial ability of the district to discharge its existing or proposed indebtedness in accordance with the service plan to the division. In such event, the division shall confer with the board of the special district and the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the municipality regarding such condition. The division may establish a standard form for the annual report that the board of a special district may elect to use.

In the case of a health service district, a change in service by the district is not deemed material unless the change affects the license or certificate of compliance issued by the department of public health and environment. A health service district is exempt from subsection (3)(b) and (3)(c) of this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1551, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(3) amended and (4) added, p. 1102, §§ 8, 9, effective May 3.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1452, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) and (3)(c) amended and (3)(d) added, p. 784, § 7, effective June 4.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 2803, § 569, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 473, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (3)(d) amended, p. 1316, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(3)(d) amended, (SB 09-087), ch. 325, p. 1732, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1239), ch. 175, p. 628, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 2021:

(3)(c), (3)(d), and (4) amended, (SB 21-262), ch. 368, p. 2428, § 4, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 32-1-209 as it existed prior to 1981. For a detailed comparison, see the table located in the back of the index.